Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
STRUCTURE POSITION DISCREPANCIES

Note

Applies to all structure position discrepancies without
regard to when the facts or actions giving rise to the discrepancy occurred. L
1997, c 131, §5; L 1999, c 185, §4.

§669-11 De minimis structure position
discrepancies, defined. For the purposes of this part, "de minimis
structure position discrepancy" means:

(1) For commercial property, industrial property, and
multi-unit residential property, 0.25 feet;

(2) For all other residential property, 0.5 feet;

(3) For agricultural and rural property, 0.75 feet;
and

(4) For conservation property, 1.5 feet;

between the location of an improvement legally
constructed along what was reasonably believed to be the boundary line and the
actual location of the boundary line based on the most recent survey. [L 1997,
c 131, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 185, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next